tr: Ekmek kırıntısı temel malzemesi: Badem; Hindistan cevizi; Mısır; Karışık glutensiz tahıllar; Domuz kabuğu; Pirinç; Soya; Saf buğday gluteni; Buğday; Diğer
sv: Basingrediens i brödsmulorna: Mandel; Kokos; Majs; Blandade glutenfria sädesslag; Fläsksvål; Ris; Soja; Vetegluten; Vete; Övrigt
es: Ingrediente base del pan rallado: Almendra; Coco; Maíz; Mezcla de granos sin gluten; Corteza de cerdo; Arroz; Soya; Gluten de trigo vital; Trigo; Otro
nb: Ingrediens i brødsmulebasen: Mandel; Kokosnøtt; Mais; Blandede glutenfrie kornsorter; Fleskesvor; Ris; Soya; Hvetegluten; Hvete; Annet
fr: Ingrédient de base de la chapelure: Amande; Noix de coco; Maïs; Mélange de céréales sans gluten; Couenne de porc; Riz; Soja; Gluten de blé vital; Blé; Autre
ru: Основной ингредиент панировочных сухарей: Миндаль; Кокос; Кукуруза; Смесь безглютеновых злаков; Свиная шкурка; Рис; Соя; Пшеничная клейковина; Пшеница; Другое
th: ส่วนผสมหลักของเกล็ดขนมปัง: อัลมอนด์; มะพร้าว; ข้าวโพด; ธัญพืชปราศจากกลูเตนผสม; แคบหมู; ข้าว; ถั่วเหลือง; ไวทัลวีทกลูเตน; ข้าวสาลี; อื่นๆ
hu: Zsemlemorzsa alapösszetevője: Mandula; Kókusz; Kukorica; Vegyes gluténmentes gabonák; Sertésbőrke; Rizs; Szója; Búzasikér; Búza; Egyéb
ja: パン粉ベースの素材: アーモンド; ココナッツ; コーン; ミックスグルテンフリー穀物; ポークリンド (豚皮); 米; 大豆; 活性小麦グルテン; 小麦; その他
sl-SI: Osnovna sestavina za drobtine: Mandelj; Kokos; Koruza; Mešana brezglutenska žita; Ocvirki; Riž; Soja; Pšenični gluten; Pšenica; Drugo
sk-SK: Základná prísada strúhanky: Mandle; Kokos; Kukurica; Zmes bezlepkových obilnín; Bravčová koža; Ryža; Sója; Vitálny pšeničný lepok; Pšenica; Iné
nl: Broodkruim basisingrediënt: Amandel; Kokos; Maïs; Gemengde glutenvrije granen; Varkenszwoerd; Rijst; Soja; Tarwegluten; Tarwe; Overig
it: ingrediente base di pangrattato: Mandorla; Cocco; Mais; Cereali misti senza glutine; Cotica di maiale; Riso; Soia; Glutine di grano vitale; Grano; Altro
de: Basiszutat des Paniermehls: Mandel; Kokosnuss; Mais; Gemischtes glutenfreies Getreide; Schweineschwarte; Reis; Soja; Weizenkleber (Seitan); Weizen; Sonstiges
cs: Hlavní složka strouhanky: Mandle; Kokos; Kukuřice; Směs bezlepkových obilovin; Vepřové kůže; Rýže; Sója; Vitální pšeničný lepek; Pšenice; Jiné
vi: Thành phần cơ bản của vụn bánh mì: Hạnh nhân; Dừa; Ngô; Ngũ cốc hỗn hợp không chứa gluten; Da heo; Gạo; Đậu nành; Gluten lúa mì nguyên chất; Lúa mì; Khác
pl: Składnik bazowy bułki tartej: Migdały; Kokos; Kukurydza; Mieszanka zbóż bezglutenowych; Skórka wieprzowa; Ryż; Soja; Witalny gluten pszenny; Pszenica; Inne
hr-HR: Sastojak za bazu od krušnih mrvica: Badem; Kokos; Kukuruz; Miješane žitarice bez glutena; Svinjska kožica; Riža; Soja; Vitalni pšenični gluten; Pšenica; Ostalo
zh-TW: 麵包粉基礎原料: 杏仁; 椰子; 玉米; 混合無麩質穀物; 豬皮; 米; 大豆; 活性小麥麵筋; 小麥; 其他
da: Grundingrediens i rasp: Mandel; Kokos; Majs; Blandede glutenfrie kornsorter; Flæskesvær; Ris; Soja; Hvedegluten; Hvede; Andet
lt-LT: Džiūvėsėlių pagrindinis ingredientas: Migdolai; Kokosai; Kukurūzai; Grūdų be glitimo mišinys; Kiaulienos odelės; Ryžiai; Soja; Gyvybinis kviečių glitimas; Kviečiai; Kita
bg-BG: Съставка за основата на галета: Бадем; Кокос; Царевица; Смес от зърнени култури без глутен; Свинска кожа; Ориз; Соя; Витален пшеничен глутен; Пшеница; Друго
el: Βασικό συστατικό πάνκο: Αμύγδαλο; Καρύδα; Καλαμπόκι; Ανάμεικτα δημητριακά χωρίς γλουτένη; Πέτσα χοιρινού; Ρύζι; Σόγια; Καθαρή γλουτένη σίτου; Σιτάρι; Άλλο
pt-BR: Ingrediente base da farinha de rosca: Amêndoa; Coco; Milho; Mistura de grãos sem glúten; Pele de porco; Arroz; Soja; Glúten de trigo vital; Trigo; Outros
pt-PT: Ingrediente base de pão ralado: Amêndoa; Coco; Milho; Mistura de cereais sem glúten; Courato de porco; Arroz; Soja; Glúten de trigo vital; Trigo; Outro
en: Bread crumb base ingredient: Almond; Coconut; Corn; Mixed gluten-free grains; Pork rind; Rice; Soy; Vital wheat gluten; Wheat; Other
ro-RO: Ingredientul de bază al pesmetului: Migdale; Nucă de cocos; Porumb; Amestec de cereale fără gluten; Șorici de porc; Orez; Soia; Gluten vital din grâu; Grâu; Altele
fi: Korppujauhon pääraaka-aine: Manteli; Kookos; Maissi; Gluteeniton viljasekoitus; Porsaan kamara; Riisi; Soija; Vehnägluteeni; Vehnä; Muu
zh-CN: 面包糠基础原料: 杏仁; 椰子; 玉米; 混合无麸质谷物; 猪皮; 大米; 大豆; 谷朊粉; 小麦; 其他
ko: 빵가루 주원료: 아몬드; 코코넛; 옥수수; 혼합 글루텐 프리 곡물; 돼지 껍질; 쌀; 대두; 활성 밀 글루텐; 밀; 기타